Indiana, session 2026, SB276.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-35-1.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 1.7. Farmers' Market Nutrition Programs
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "SNAP" has the meaning set
forth in IC 12-7-2-178.9.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "WIC" has the meaning set forth
in IC 16-35-1.5-2.
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the state department shall
provide for:
(1) an Indiana resident who receives SNAP benefits to receive
triple value for the recipient's SNAP benefits when used to
purchase produce at a farmers' market that participates in a
program funded in whole or in part through the federal Gus
Schumacher Nutrition Incentive Program, including:
(A) the Double Up Indiana program; and
(B) the Fresh Bucks program; and
2026 IN 276—LS 7074/DI 119


(2) an Indiana resident who receives WIC benefits to receive
triple value for the recipient's WIC benefits when used to
purchase produce at a farmers' market that participates in
the federal:
(A) WIC Farmers' Market Nutrition Program; or
(B) Senior Farmers' Market Nutrition Program;
through price discounts, matching benefits, or a combination of
price discounts and matching benefits.
(b) If the state department determines that a plan amendment,
plan waiver, or other authorization by the United States
Department of Agriculture is necessary to implement subsection
(a), the state department:
(1) shall, not later than September 1, 2026, request the
necessary amendment, waiver, or authorization;
(2) may delay implementation of subsection (a) until the
amendment, waiver, or authorization is granted; and
(3) shall begin implementing subsection (a) not later than
thirty (30) days after the United States Department of
Agriculture grants the amendment, waiver, or authorization.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 276—LS 7074/DI 119